New York, session 2025-2026, A9673.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 210-B of the tax law is amended by adding two new 2 subdivisions 63 and 64 to read as follows: 3 63. Employment of New York national guard and reserve members wage tax 4 credit. (a) Allowance of credit. A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit, 5 in the amount of one thousand five hundred dollars, against the tax 6 imposed by this article for each member of the New York national guard 7 and reserves which it employs. Provided, however, such taxpayer shall 8 comply with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights 9 Act, as found in section 4301 et seq. of title 18 of the United States 10 Code; and provided further that such person shall have been employed for 11 at least six months. 12 (b) Application of credit. The credit allowed under this subdivision 13 for any taxable year shall not reduce the tax due for such year to less 14 than the minimum amount prescribed in paragraph (d) of subdivision one 15 of section two hundred ten of this article. If, however, the amount of 16 credits allowed under this subdivision for any taxable year reduces the 17 tax to such amount, any amount of credit thus not deductible in such 18 taxable year shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be credited or 19 refunded in accordance with the provisions of section one thousand 20 eighty-six of this chapter. Provided, however, the provisions of 21 subsection (c) of section one thousand eighty-eight of this chapter 22 notwithstanding, no interest shall be paid thereon. 23 64. Employment of volunteer firefighters and emergency medical 24 services (EMS) first responder personnel wage credit. (a) Allowance of 25 credit. A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit of one thousand five 26 hundred dollars, against the tax imposed by this article, for each 27 volunteer firefighter and EMS first responder personnel which it EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01780-03-6 A. 9673 2 1 employs; provided that such person shall have been employed for at least 2 six months. 3 (b) Application of credit. The credit allowed under this subdivision 4 for any taxable year shall not reduce the tax due for such year to less 5 than the minimum amount prescribed in paragraph (d) of subdivision one 6 of section two hundred ten of this article. If, however, the amount of 7 credits allowed under this subdivision for any taxable year reduces the 8 tax to such amount, any amount of credit thus not deductible in such 9 taxable year shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be credited or 10 refunded in accordance with the provisions of section one thousand 11 eighty-six of this chapter. Provided, however, the provisions of 12 subsection (c) of section one thousand eighty-eight of this chapter 13 notwithstanding, no interest shall be paid thereon. 14 § 2. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph 1 of subsection (i) of section 606 15 of the tax law is amended by adding two new clauses (liii) and (liv) to 16 read as follows: 17 (liii) Employment of New Amount of credit 18 York national under subdivision 19 guard and reserve sixty-three of 20 members credit section two hundred ten-B 21 under sub- 22 section (www) 23 (liv) Employment of volunteer Amount of credit under 24 firefighters and EMS subdivision sixty-four of 25 first responder section two hundred ten-B 26 personnel wage 27 credit under sub- 28 section (xxx) 29 § 3. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding two new 30 subsections (www) and (xxx) to read as follows: 31 (www) Employment of New York national guard and reserve member credit. 32 (1) Allowance of credit. A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit, as here- 33 inafter provided, against the tax imposed by this article if they employ 34 New York national guard and reserve members. Provided, however, they 35 shall comply with the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment 36 Rights Act, as found in section 4301 et seq. of title 18 of the United 37 States Code; and provided, further that such person shall have been 38 employed for at least six months. The amount of the credit shall be 39 fifteen hundred dollars for each national guard member or reservist 40 employed. 41 (2) Application of credit. If the amount of the credit allowed under 42 this subsection for any taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for 43 such year, the excess shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be 44 credited or refunded in accordance with the provisions of section six 45 hundred eighty-six of this article, provided, however, that no interest 46 shall be paid thereon. 47 (3) Carryover. If the amount of credit allowable under this subsection 48 for any taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, the 49 excess may be carried over to the following year or years, and may be 50 deducted from the taxpayer's tax for such year or years. 51 (xxx) Employment of volunteer firefighters and EMS first responder 52 personnel wage credit. (1) Allowance of credit. A taxpayer shall be 53 allowed a credit, as hereinafter provided, against the tax imposed by A. 9673 3 1 this article for each volunteer firefighter and EMS first responder 2 personnel which it employs; provided that such person shall have been 3 employed for at least six months. The amount of the credit shall be 4 fifteen hundred dollars for each volunteer firefighter and EMS first 5 responder employed. 6 (2) Application of credit. If the amount of the credit allowed under 7 this subsection for any taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for 8 such year, the excess shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be 9 credited or refunded in accordance with the provisions of section six 10 hundred eighty-six of this article, provided, however, that no interest 11 shall be paid thereon. 12 (3) Carryover. If the amount of credit allowable under this subsection 13 for any taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, the 14 excess may be carried over to the following year or years, and may be 15 deducted from the taxpayer's tax for such year or years. 16 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 17 years beginning on and after January 1, 2028. Effective immediately the 18 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 19 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 20 to be made and completed on or before such date.